Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-774
Certified, defined.

Certified shall mean approved by the Division of Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services to render specific types or levels of care to the person suffering from the disease of alcoholism.

Laws 1980, LB 646, § 6;

Laws 1995, LB 275, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 239;

Laws 2004, LB 1083, § 97;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 176.